Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201848-1,110
Act, how cited.

Sections 48-101 to 48-1,117 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act.

Laws 1986, LB 811, § 136;

Laws 1986, LB 1036, § 2;

Laws 1990, LB 313, § 4;

Laws 1992, LB 360, § 26;

Laws 1993, LB 757, § 30;

Laws 1997, LB 128, § 7;

Laws 1997, LB 474, § 7;

Laws 2005, LB 13, § 32;

Laws 2007, LB588, § 5;

Laws 2010, LB780, § 3;

Laws 2011, LB151, § 16;

Laws 2015, LB480, § 5.